apertium-bel.bel.dix
    <pardef n="сп/аць__vblex_impf_iv">
        <e><p><l>аць</l><r>аць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l></l><r>аць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__люб/лю"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r>аць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__люб/ім"/></e>

        <e><p><l>а</l><r>аць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бы/ў"/></e>

        <e><p><l>і</l><r>аць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__чака/й"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="бач/ыць__vblex_impf_tv">
        <e><p><l>ыць</l><r>ыць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l></l><r>ыць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бач/у"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r>ыць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бач/ым"/></e>

        <e><p><l>ы</l><r>ыць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бы/ў"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="сконч/ыць__vblex_perf_tv">
        <e><p><l>ыць</l><r>ыць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l></l><r>ыць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бач/у"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r>ыць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бач/ым"/></e>

        <e><p><l>ы</l><r>ыць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бы/ў"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ка/заць__vblex_impf_tv">
        <e><p><l>заць</l><r>заць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l></l><r>заць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__адка/жу"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r>заць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__адка/жам"/></e>

        <e><p><l>за</l><r>заць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бы/ў"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="х/ацець__vbmod_impf_tv">
        <e><p><l>ацець</l><r>ацець<s n="vbmod"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>ачу</l><r>ацець<s n="vbmod"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>очаш</l><r>ацець<s n="vbmod"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>оча</l><r>ацець<s n="vbmod"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>очам</l><r>ацець<s n="vbmod"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>очаце</l><r>ацець<s n="vbmod"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>очуць</l><r>ацець<s n="vbmod"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>ате</l><r>ацець<s n="vbmod"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бы/ў"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="б/егчы__vblex_impf_iv">
        <e><p><l>егчы</l><r>егчы<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>ягу</l><r>егчы<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>яжыш</l><r>егчы<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>яжыць</l><r>егчы<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>яжым</l><r>егчы<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ежыце</l><r>егчы<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ягуць</l><r>егчы<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="з/нікнуць__vblex_perf_iv">
        <e><p><l>нікнуць</l><r>нікнуць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>ьнікаю</l><r>нікнуць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>нікаеш</l><r>нікнуць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>нікне</l><r>нікнуць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ьнікаем</l><r>нікнуць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>нікаеце</l><r>нікнуць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>нікаюць</l><r>нікнуць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>нік</l><r>нікнуць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="BASE__знік"/></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Interjections -->
    <pardef n="так__ij">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Abbreviations -->

    <pardef n="км__abbr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="тыс.__abbr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="спаць"><i>сп</i><par n="сп/аць__vblex_impf_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="бачыць"><i>бач</i><par n="бач/ыць__vblex_impf_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="лічыць"><i>ліч</i><par n="бач/ыць__vblex_impf_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="скончыць"><i>сконч</i><par n="сконч/ыць__vblex_perf_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="казаць"><i>ка</i><par n="ка/заць__vblex_impf_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="хацець"><i>х</i><par n="х/ацець__vbmod_impf_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="бегчы"><i>б</i><par n="б/егчы__vblex_impf_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="знікнуць"><i>з</i><par n="з/нікнуць__vblex_perf_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="не"><i>не</i><par n="так__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="см"><i>см</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="км"><i>км</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="мм"><i>мм</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="кг"><i>кг</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="мг"><i>мг</i><par n="км__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="тыс."><i>тыс.</i><par n="тыс.__abbr"/></e>
